Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.030

Council created—Powers and duties.

There is created the Washington state forensic investigations council. The council shall oversee the bureau of forensic laboratory services and, in consultation with the chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee, control the operation and establish policies of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. The council may also study and recommend cost-efficient improvements to the death investigation system in Washington and report its findings to the legislature.

The forensic investigations council shall be responsible for the oversight of any state forensic pathology program authorized by the legislature.

The forensic investigations council shall be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget and shall approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget prior to its formal submission to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

[ 2005 c 166 s 2; 1999 c 40 s 4; 1995 c 398 s 4; 1991 c 176 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 40: See note following RCW 43.103.010.